Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202544-5443
Artificial intelligence-based algorithm; use; restrictions; automated utilization management system; audit.

(1) An artificial intelligence-based algorithm shall not be the sole basis of a utilization review agent's decision to deny, delay, or modify health care services based, in whole or in part, on medical necessity.

(2) A utilization review agent shall disclose to the department, to each health care provider in its network, to each enrollee, and on its public website if artificial intelligence-based algorithms are used or will be used in the utilization review process.

(3) The department may, at any time, audit a utilization review agent's automated utilization management system. The department may contract with a third-party entity to perform an audit pursuant to this section.

Laws 2025, LB77, § 12.